West Virginia, session 2025, SB372.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Architects. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 2, 2024, authorized under the authority of §30-12-1 of this code, modified by the Board of Architects to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on August 28, 2024, relating to the Board of Architects (registration of architects, 2 CSR 01), is authorized.